Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Juvenile Delinquency Prevention and Detention Alternatives

15A.270.
Administrative regulations governing fund — Hearings.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate and enforce administrative regulations to govern at least the following aspects of the operation of the local alternatives-to-detention fund:

Application procedures, including granting and denying applications;

Program and funding restrictions;

Program and funding reports;

Termination of programs; and

Other related matters.

Administrative hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority of this section shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 180, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 135, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 318, § 18, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 443, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

15A.300.
Local juvenile delinquency prevention council — Duties — Administrative regulations.

The Department of Juvenile Justice or a local organization approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice may form local juvenile delinquency prevention councils for the purpose of encouraging the initiation of, or supporting ongoing, interagency cooperation and collaboration in addressing juvenile crime and juvenile status offenses.

The membership of the local council shall be determined by the Department of Juvenile Justice and shall include representatives of law enforcement, the school system, the Department for Community Based Services, the Court of Justice, the Commonwealth’s attorney, the county attorney, a representative of a county juvenile detention facility, and the Department of Public Advocacy. The members of the council shall be appointed as provided by the department by administrative regulation and shall be appointed for not longer than four (4) years, but members may be reappointed for a successive term. A member of the council shall receive no salary for service as a member of the council but may be reimbursed for expenses in the same manner as a state employee.

The duties and responsibilities of a juvenile delinquency prevention council shall include but not be limited to:

Developing a local juvenile justice plan based upon utilization of the resources of law enforcement, the school system, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department for Community Based Services, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and others in a cooperative and collaborative manner to prevent or discourage juvenile delinquency and to develop meaningful alternatives to incarceration;

Entering into a written local interagency agreement specifying the nature and extent of contributions that each signatory agency will make in achieving the goals of the local juvenile justice plan;

Sharing of information as authorized by law to carry out the interagency agreements;

Applying for and receiving public or private grants to be administered by one (1) of the participating cities or counties or other public agencies; and

Providing a forum for the presentation of interagency recommendations and the resolution of disagreements relating to the contents of the interagency agreement or the performance by the parties of their respective obligations under the agreement.

Training of council members shall be the responsibility of the department.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may provide grants to the councils to establish or enhance prevention programs.

To assist in the development of a local juvenile delinquency prevention plan, juvenile delinquency prevention councils shall be entitled to request and receive statistical information and aggregate data not descriptive of any readily identifiable person from any public agency, as defined in KRS

61.870

.

A request for statistical information and aggregate data from the juvenile delinquency prevention council shall be in writing and signed by the chairperson of the council, and shall include a statement of why the information is being requested, why it is needed, and how it will be used by the council.

Any public agency receiving a written request from the chairperson of a juvenile delinquency prevention council for aggregate data or statistical information shall provide the requested information or respond to the council stating reasons why the requested information cannot be provided, within thirty (30) days of receiving the request.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that relate to:

The formation of councils;

The operation of councils;

The duties of councils; and

The administration and operation of the grant program.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 257, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 167, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

15A.305.
Statewide detention program — Alternatives to secure detention — Notification system — Per diem charge to lodge juveniles in state-owned or contracted preadjudication facilities — Fiscal court approval before state takeover, purchase, or control.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall, with available funds, develop and administer a statewide detention program and, as each regional facility is constructed and ready for occupancy, shall, within appropriation limitations, provide for:

The operation of preadjudication detention facilities for children charged with public offenses; and

The operation of postadjudication detention facilities for children adjudicated delinquent or found guilty of public offenses.

In each region in which the Department of Juvenile Justice operates or contracts for the operation of a detention facility, the department shall, within appropriation limitations, develop and administer a program for alternatives to secure detention that shall provide for:

The operation of or contracting for the operation of preadjudication alternatives to secure detention and follow-up programs for juveniles who are before the court or who enter pretrial diversion or informal adjustment programs; and

The operation of or contracting for the operation of postadjudication alternatives to secure detention and follow-up programs, including but not limited to community-based programs, mentoring, counseling, and other programs designed to limit the unnecessary use of secure detention and ensure public safety.

The department shall develop and implement a system to immediately notify the Cabinet for Health and Family Services when a status offender or child alleged to be a status offender has been detained for the alleged violation of a valid court order.

The department may, except as provided in KRS

635.060

, charge counties, consolidated local governments, and urban-county governments a per diem not to exceed ninety-four dollars ($94) for lodging juveniles in state-owned or contracted facilities.

Detention rates charged by contracting detention facilities shall not exceed the rate in effect on July 1, 1997, subject to increases approved by the department.

No juvenile detention facility, as defined in KRS

15A.200

, shall be taken over, purchased, or leased by the Commonwealth without prior approval of the fiscal court upon consultation with the jailer in the county where the facility is located. The county, upon consultation with the jailer, may enter into contracts with the Commonwealth for the holding, detention, and transportation of juveniles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 257, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 346, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 87, § 13, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 132, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

15A.310.
Juvenile data elements for centralized criminal history record information system — Access.

The Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Department of Corrections, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be responsible for the recording of those data elements for juveniles that are needed for the development of the centralized criminal history record information system.

The database shall at a minimum contain the information required in KRS

27A.310

to

27A.440

.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide access to Commonwealth’s attorneys, county attorneys, law enforcement agencies, the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Corrections, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts to its database.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 87, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 50, effective June 26, 2007.

15A.312.
Database update by Department of Juvenile Justice.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall update its database within thirty (30) days of receipt of information. The update shall include information from the:

Offender records;

Institutional records; and

Administrative records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

15A.314.
Renumbered as 194A.360. [Repealed]

15A.320.
Youth alternative centers.

Any county, urban-county, or charter county may apply to the Department of Juvenile Justice to construct, operate, or contract for the operation of a youth alternative center.

The youth alternative center shall be a nonsecure facility and shall be under the jurisdiction of that governing body, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

The youth alternative center shall be used only for the detention of juveniles. The youth alternative center shall not be part of a county jail or other facility that houses adult offenders.

The youth alternative center may be used as a place of detention for juveniles by order of a court prior to adjudication and after adjudication regardless of whether the child is a status offender, public offender, or youthful offender.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 534, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.